Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF1025.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: Section 1. NEW SECTION . 314.16A Interstate road designation ââ prohibition. The department of transportation and the state transportation commission shall not pursue an interstate road designation for the segment of highway that is a controlled-access facility, as defined in section 306A.2, designated as state highway 5 and United States highway 65, including where the highway designations overlap, between interstate 35 and interstate 80, unless the United States government provides an exemption to federal regulations regarding vehicle weight and size on that segment. The federal exemption must authorize any vehicle that is not prohibited from being operated on the segment prior to the date of designation as an interstate road to continue to be operated on the segment after designation as an interstate road. House File 1025, p. 2 Sec. 2. Section 321.285, subsection 5, paragraph e, Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: e. (1) Any kind of A vehicle, device, implement, or conveyance incapable of attaining and maintaining a speed of forty miles per hour shall be prohibited from using the interstate road system. (2) This paragraph does not apply to an implement of husbandry that a person is authorized to operate on the segment of United States highway 65, and state highway 5, including where the highway designations overlap, between the highwayâs intersection with United States highway 6 and the highwayâs intersection with United States highway 69, or farther west if authorized by the department, prior to the date that segment of highway is designated a part of the interstate road system, if the segment of highway is designated a part of the interstate road system. The department may authorize an implement of husbandry to be operated on a segment of the highway described above farther west beyond the intersection with United States highway 69. This subparagraph is repealed on the date an alternative route for implements of husbandry is developed, deemed suitable by the department of transportation in consultation with the department of agriculture and land stewardship, and opened for traffic to bypass the segment of the interstate road system described in this subparagraph. The department of transportation shall notify the Iowa Code editor on that date. Sec. 3. ALTERNATIVE HIGHWAY STUDY. The department of transportation shall collaborate with the Des Moines area metropolitan planning organization as the organization conducts an alternative highway study to develop and implement an accessible highway route suitable for implements of husbandry to be operated alongside, but not directly on, the segment of United States highway 65, and state highway 5, including where the highway designations overlap, between United States highway 6 and United States highway 69. Sec. 4. APPLICABILITY. This Act applies to the segment of the highway known as United States highway 65, and state highway 5, including where the highway designations overlap, described in this Act on the effective date of this Act, House File 1025, p. 3 and shall apply to that segment of the highway thereafter regardless of whether the highwayâs designation as United States highway 65, or state highway 5, including where the highway designations overlap, is subsequently changed by the state transportation commission, department of transportation, or the government of the United States. ______________________________ PAT GRASSLEY Speaker of the House ______________________________ AMY SINCLAIR President of the Senate I hereby certify that this bill originated in the House and is known as House File 1025, Ninety-first General Assembly. ______________________________ MEGHAN NELSON Chief Clerk of the House Approved _______________, 2025 ______________________________ KIM REYNOLDS Governor